Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1449
Committee; statement of organization; filing; procedure; late filing fees.

(1) Each committee shall file a statement of organization pursuant to this section and pay a registration fee pursuant to section 49-1449.01 with the commission. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, such statement of organization shall be filed and fee paid within ten days after a committee is formed. The commission shall maintain a statement of organization filed by a committee until notified of the committee's dissolution. Any person who fails to file with the commission a statement of organization required by this subsection shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day the statement remains not filed in violation of this subsection, not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars.

(2) If the committee is formed within thirty days prior to an election for which the committee exists, the statement of organization shall be filed and registration fee paid within two business days after the committee is formed. Any person who fails to file with the commission a statement of organization required by this subsection shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of two hundred dollars for each day the statement remains not filed in violation of this subsection, not to exceed two thousand dollars.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 49;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 349, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB527, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 48.
July 18, 2026